src/fst/morphology/affixes/noun_affixes.lexc
! Blackfoot Regular Noun Inflectional Morphology

LEXICON N_NOUN_PREFIXES !! [OLD: NOUN_PREFIXES]
NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES ;
NOUN_SHORT_PREFIXES ;

LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@nit%<    PRE_INDEP_FLAG ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@kit%<    PRE_INDEP_FLAG ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@ot%<     PRE_INDEP_FLAG ;
@P.person.NULL@0                    PRE_INDEP_FLAG ;

LEXICON PRE_INDEP_FLAG
@P.class.NOUN@ PRENOUNS ;
@P.class.VERB@ N_PREFIXES ; !! [OLD: PREFIXES]

! LEXICON NON_INDEP_FLAG
! PRENOUNS ;

LEXICON NOUN_SHORT_PREFIXES
@P.person.NI@:@P.person.NI@n%<    DEP_STEMS ;
@P.person.KI@:@P.person.KI@k%<    DEP_STEMS ;
@P.person.OT@:@P.person.OT@w%<    DEP_STEMS ;

! This is the preverb set, which can only combine with verb suffixes

LEXICON N_PREFIXES !! [OLD: PREFIXES]
@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@@P.count1.N@@P.count1.T@@P.count1.A@@P.count1.P@ N_PV_COUNTER1 ; !! [OLD: PV_COUNTER1]
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2máát N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2miin N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@Neg+:@R.mode.IMP@@P.count1.N@%^SPi2piin N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@PV/máátaommita'p+:@R.mode.IND@@P.count1.N@%^SPmáátaommita'p N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@P.count1.P@PV/ikátá'+:@P.count1.P@i2kátá' N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@P.count1.T@Imm+:@P.count1.T@ayáak N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@P.count1.T@Dur+:@P.count1.T@á N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@P.count1.T@Fut+:@P.count1.T@yáak N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@P.count1.T@Past+:@P.count1.T@ii N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@akáa N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@ikáa N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]
@P.count1.A@Perf+:@P.count1.A@okáa N_BOUND1 ; !! [OLD: BOUND1]

LEXICON N_BOUND1 !! [OLD: BOUND1]
0:%< N_PV_COUNTER1 ; !! [OLD: PV_COUNTER1]

LEXICON N_PV_COUNTER1 !! [OLD: PV_COUNTER1]
@D.pvcountf@@R.count1.N@@P.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.N@ N_PREFIXES ; !! [OLD: PREFIXES]
@R.pvcountf.1@@R.count1.T@@P.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.T@ N_PREFIXES ; !! [OLD: PREFIXES]
@R.pvcountf.2@@R.count1.A@@P.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.A@ N_PREFIXES ; !! [OLD: PREFIXES]
@R.pvcountf.3@@R.count1.P@@P.pvcountf.4@@R.count1.P@ N_PREFIXES ; !! [OLD: PREFIXES]
0 PRENOUNS ;
 
LEXICON N_BOUND !! [OLD: BOUND]
0:%< N_PV_COUNTER ; !! [OLD: PV_COUNTER]

LEXICON N_PV_COUNTER !! [OLD: PV_COUNTER]
@D.pvcount@@P.pvcount.1@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.1@@P.pvcount.2@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.2@@P.pvcount.3@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.3@@P.pvcount.4@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.4@@P.pvcount.5@ PRENOUNS ;
@R.pvcount.5@@P.pvcount.6@ PRENOUNS ;

!!!!! After this, we collect the stems !!!!!

!!!!! And then we return for the suffixes

LEXICON NA
@P.pos.NA@@R.class.NOUN@+NA:@P.pos.NA@@R.class.NOUN@0  IM ;
@R.class.VERB@+VAI:@R.class.VERB@0 N_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: VAI_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON NA_IM
@P.im.IM@@P.pos.NA@@R.class.NOUN@+NA:@P.im.IM@@P.pos.NA@@R.class.NOUN@  IM ;
@R.class.VERB@+VAI:@R.class.VERB@0 N_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: VAI_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON NI
@P.pos.NI@@R.class.NOUN@+NI:@P.pos.NI@@R.class.NOUN@0  IM ;
@R.class.VERB@+VII:@R.class.VERB@0 N_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: VII_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON NI_IM
@P.im.IM@@P.pos.NI@@R.class.NOUN@+NI:@P.im.IM@@P.pos.NI@@R.class.NOUN@0  IM ;
@R.class.VERB@+VII:@R.class.VERB@0 N_VII_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: VII_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON NAD
@P.pos.NA@+NAD:@P.pos.NA@0 N_POSS_NUM ; !! [OLD: POSS_NUM]

LEXICON NID
@P.pos.NI@+NID:@P.pos.NI@0 N_POSS_NUM ; !! [OLD: POSS_NUM]

! Below is the combinatorial PARADIGM for the possessive circumfixes

! POSS+stem+POSS+NUM
! POSS+stem+POSS+OBV
! stem+NUM
! stem+OBV

LEXICON IM
0 N_POSS_NUM ; !! [OLD: POSS_NUM]
@D.person.NULL@:@D.person.NULL@%>im N_POSS_NUM ; !! [OLD: POSS_NUM]
@D.person.NULL@@D.im.IM@ N_POSS_NUM ; !! [OLD: POSS_NUM]
@R.person.NULL@ N_POSS_NUM ; !! [OLD: POSS_NUM]

LEXICON N_POSS_NUM !! [OLD: POSS_NUM]
! Singular possessors
@R.person.NI@+Px1Sg:@R.person.NI@0 N_NOUN_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
@R.person.KI@+Px2Sg:@R.person.KI@0 N_NOUN_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
@R.person.OT@+Px3Sg:@R.person.OT@0 N_NOUN_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
@R.person.NULL@:@R.person.NULL@0 N_NOUN_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
! Plural possessors
@R.person.NI@+Px1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>innaan N_NOUN_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
@R.person.KI@+Px21Pl:@R.person.KI@%>innoon N_NOUN_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
@R.person.KI@+Px2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>oaawa N_NOUN_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
@R.person.OT@+Px3Pl:@R.person.OT@%>oaawa N_NOUN_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON N_NOUN_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: NOUN_SUFFIXES]
@R.pos.NA@ N_NA_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NA_SUFFIXES]
@R.pos.NI@ N_NI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: NI_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON N_NA_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: NA_SUFFIXES]
! Obviative
@R.person.NULL@+Obv:@R.person.NULL@%>yi # ; ! Optional obviative with non-possessed form
@D.person.NULL@@R.person.OT@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@R.person.OT@%>yi # ; ! Obligatory obviative with 3rd person possessor
@D.person.NULL@@D.person.OT@+Obv:@D.person.NULL@@D.person.OT@%>yi # ; ! Optional obviative with non-3rd possessor
! Plural
+Pl:%>iksi # ; ! Optional plural NO CONDITIONS (other than non-singular)
! Non-Referring
+Non:%>i # ; ! Optional non-referring suffix, number unrestricted
@D.person.OT@+Sg:@D.person.OT@%>wa # ; ! Optional singular for non-3rd person possessed, non-plural only

LEXICON N_NI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: NI_SUFFIXES]
@D.number.PL@+Sg:@D.number.PL@%>yi # ; 
@D.number.SG@+Pl:@D.number.SG@%>istsi # ;
@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@+Non:@D.number.SG@@D.number.PL@%>i # ;

! Below is the set of verb suffixes that occur when a noun undergoes the verbalization process. (aakiiyiwa 'she is a woman').
! They are only instransitive verbs. Some things to note. I have only included the person suffixes, not the derivational suffixes.
! This verb paradigm does not include dependent nouns.

LEXICON N_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: VAI_SUFFIXES]
@P.mode.IND@+Ind:@P.mode.IND@ N_INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
@P.mode.CON@+Cnj:@P.mode.CON@ N_CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: CONJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
@P.mode.SUB@+Sbj:@P.mode.SUB@ N_SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: SUBJ_VAI_SUFFIXES]
@P.mode.IRR@+Irr:@P.mode.IRR@ N_UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: UNREAL_VAI_SUFFIXES]
@P.mode.IMP@+Imp:@P.mode.IMP@ N_IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES ; !! [OLD: IMP_VAI_SUFFIXES]

LEXICON N_INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES !! [OLD: INDEP_VAI_SUFFIXES]
! Third Person Interrogatives
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waatsiksi # ;
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl+INTERR:@R.person.NULL@%>waiksaawa # ;
! Singular INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Sg:@R.person.NI@%>yi N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.KI@+2Sg:@R.person.KI@%>yi N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.NULL@+3Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>wa N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Sg:@R.person.NULL@%>yini N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
! Plural INDEPENDENT
@R.person.NI@+1Pl:@R.person.NI@%>yihpinnaana N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.NULL@+21Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yio'pa N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.KI@+2Pl:@R.person.KI@%>yihpoaawa N_ANIM_INTERR ; !! [OLD: ANIM_INTERR]
@R.person.NULL@+3Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]
@R.person.NULL@+4Pl:@R.person.NULL@%>yi N_ENCLITICS ; !! [OLD: ENCLITICS]

LEXICON PRENOUNS
PV/aahksikkam+:%^SPaahksikkam N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ai'tamáak+:ai'tamáak N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/akoksska+:akoksska N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/anaw+:anaw N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/anow+:anow N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/assaak+:assaak N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/i'sskaan+:i2'sskaan N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/iiht+:iiht N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/iikska'+:iikska' N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/iimá+:iimá N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/iinatt+:iinatt N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/iitsiksist+:iitsiksist N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ika'to+:i2ka'to N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ikamo't+:ikamo't N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ikihkiht+:ikihkiht N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ikippa'+:i2kippa' N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ikkihkini+:ikkihkini N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/iksksowa'+:iksksowa' N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ikíppoa+:ikíppoa N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/inai't+:inai't N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ipahtsik+:i2pahtsik N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ipapa+:ipapa N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ipoina+:ipoina N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ippoa+:ippoa N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ipákkssa+:i2pákkssa N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/isk+:isk N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ist+:ist N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/istsa'+:i2stsa' N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/isttssi+:i2sttssi N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/iton+:iton N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/iámoohk+:iámoohk N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/kan+:hkan N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/kotski+:i2kotski N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/káátsisto+:káátsisto N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/máttsit+:%^SPmáttsit N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/mato+:mato N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/miistap+:miistap N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/mo'tóí+:mo'tóí N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/naat+:%^SPnaat N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/niitsi+:niitsi N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/noohkátt+:%^SPnoohkátt N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/o'kio+:o'kio N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ohkana+:ohkana N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ohpii+:ohpii N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ohpok+:ohpok N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/oka'p+:oka'p N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/omanista+:omanista N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/omo'tap+:omo'tap N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/omá+:omá N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/onaki+:onaki N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/oohkatt+:oohkatt N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/otomohk+:otomohk N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/po'kí+:po'kí N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/sa+:saw N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/saipa'+:saipa' N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/sootam+:i2sootam N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/sska'+:sska' N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/sstok+:sstok N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ssáak+:i2ssáak N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/waahki+:waahki N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/waahtso+:waahtso N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/waanook+:waanook N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/wáyák+:wáyák N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/yook+:yook N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/áka+:áka N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/ááhkamá'p+:ááhkamá'p N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PV/íka+:íka N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/aaká+:aaká N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/áápi+:áápi N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/aká+:aká N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/apak+:apak N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/ayaam+:ayaam N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/i'tsin+:i'tsin N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/iinohk+:iinohk N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/ikaw+:ikaw N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/iki'ta+:i2ki'ta N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/ikkak+:ikkak N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/iksi's+:iksi's N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/iksim+:iksim N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/iksisto+:i2ksisto N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/inap+:inap N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/inno+:i2nno N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/ipahtsi+:i2pahtsi N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/ippat+:ippat N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/iss+:iss N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/isttohk+:isttohk N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/itsin+:itsin N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/ksis+:ksis N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/mattsi+:mattsi N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/naam+:naam N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/nimm+:nimm N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/o'totam+:o'totam N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/ohpo+:ohpo N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/okaki+:okaki N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/oohsi+:oohsi N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/otats+:otats N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/paahksíst+:paahksíst N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/sa+:sa N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/sainnis+:sainnis N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/sata+:sata N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/sikim+:i2sikim N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/sohk+:sohk N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/ssk+:ssk N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/sspik+:sspik N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/waaist+:waaist N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/waaniit+:waaniit N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/waawow+:waawow N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
PN/yaam+:yaam N_BOUND ; !! [OLD: BOUND]
